test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_C_nik_gt-norm.yaml
     1+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ninikimishinaanidig, ninikimishinaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ninikimishinaanidig, ninikimishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: ginikimishinaanibaniing
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: ginikimishinaanibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: ginikimishinaanibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [ginikimishinaanidig, ginikimishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [ginikimishinaanidig, ginikimishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [ginikimishinaanidig, ginikimishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: ginikimishiwaabaniing
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: ginikimishiwaabaniin
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: ginikimishiwaabaniin
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ginikimishiwaadig, ginikimishiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ginikimishiwaadig, ginikimishiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ginikimishiwaadig, ginikimishiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: onikimishiniibaniing
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: onikimishiniibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: onikimishiniibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [onikimishiniidig, onikimishiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [onikimishiniidig, onikimishiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [onikimishiniidig, onikimishiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: onikimishiwaabaniing
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: onikimishiwaabaniin
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: onikimishiwaabaniin
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [onikimishiwaadig, onikimishiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [onikimishiwaadig, onikimishiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [onikimishiwaadig, onikimishiwaadog]
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: ninikenyimishinaanibaniing
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: ninikenyimishinaanibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: ninikenyimishinaanibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ninikenyimishinaanidig, ninikenyimishinaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ninikenyimishinaanidig, ninikenyimishinaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ninikenyimishinaanidig, ninikenyimishinaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: ninikensimishinaanibaniing
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: ninikensimishinaanibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: ninikensimishinaanibaniin
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ninikensimishinaanidig, ninikensimishinaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ninikensimishinaanidig, ninikensimishinaanidog]
     1+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ninikensimishinaanidig, ninikensimishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: ginikenyimishinaanibaniing
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: ginikenyimishinaanibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: ginikenyimishinaanibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [ginikenyimishinaanidig, ginikenyimishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [ginikenyimishinaanidig, ginikenyimishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [ginikenyimishinaanidig, ginikenyimishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: ginikenyimishiwaabaniing
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: ginikenyimishiwaabaniin
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: ginikenyimishiwaabaniin
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ginikenyimishiwaadig, ginikenyimishiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ginikenyimishiwaadig, ginikenyimishiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ginikenyimishiwaadig, ginikenyimishiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: ginikensimishinaanibaniing
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: ginikensimishinaanibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: ginikensimishinaanibaniin
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [ginikensimishinaanidig, ginikensimishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [ginikensimishinaanidig, ginikensimishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [ginikensimishinaanidig, ginikensimishinaanidog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: ginikensimishiwaabaniing
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: ginikensimishiwaabaniin
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: ginikensimishiwaabaniin
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ginikensimishiwaadig, ginikensimishiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ginikensimishiwaadig, ginikensimishiwaadog]
     2+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ginikensimishiwaadig, ginikensimishiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: onikenyimishiniibaniing
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: onikenyimishiniibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: onikenyimishiniibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [onikenyimishiniidig, onikenyimishiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [onikenyimishiniidig, onikenyimishiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [onikenyimishiniidig, onikenyimishiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: onikenyimishiwaabaniing
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: onikenyimishiwaabaniin
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: onikenyimishiwaabaniin
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [onikenyimishiwaadig, onikenyimishiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [onikenyimishiwaadig, onikenyimishiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [onikenyimishiwaadig, onikenyimishiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: onikensimishiniibaniing
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: onikensimishiniibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: onikensimishiniibaniin
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [onikensimishiniidig, onikensimishiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [onikensimishiniidig, onikensimishiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [onikensimishiniidig, onikensimishiniidog]
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: onikensimishiwaabaniing
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: onikensimishiwaabaniin
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: onikensimishiwaabaniin
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [onikensimishiwaadig, onikensimishiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [onikensimishiwaadig, onikensimishiwaadog]
     3+nik+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [onikensimishiwaadig, onikensimishiwaadog]
     
